Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-807
Judicial nominating commission; lawyer members; certificate of selection.

Upon the selection of any lawyer member or alternate lawyer member of any judicial nominating commission, the Clerk of the Supreme Court shall promptly certify his or her selection to the Governor and the Secretary of State.

Laws 1963, c. 124, § 7, p. 475;

Laws 1973, LB 110, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 251, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 303, § 4.